Washington statutes.
RCW 2.14.040

Administration of plan.

The administrator for the courts, under the direction of the board for judicial administration, shall administer the plan. The administrator shall:

(1) Deposit or invest contributions to the plan consistent with RCW 2.14.080;

(2) Credit investment earnings or interest to individual judicial retirement accounts consistent with RCW 2.14.070;

(3) Keep or cause to be kept full and adequate accounts and records of the assets, obligations, transactions, and affairs of any judicial retirement accounts created under this chapter; and

(4) Adopt rules necessary to carry out this chapter.

[ 1998 c 245 s 1; 1988 c 109 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.